en: Tracking metrics: Blood pressure; Body fat; Calories; Distance traveled; Heart rate; Sleep; Steps; Other
el: Μετρήσεις παρακολούθησης: Αρτηριακή πίεση; Σωματικό λίπος; Θερμίδες; Διανυθείσα απόσταση; Καρδιακός ρυθμός; Υπνος; Βήματα; Άλλο
it: Parametri di monitoraggio: Pressione sanguigna; Grasso corporeo; Calorie; Distanza percorsa; Frequenza cardiaca; Sonno; Passi; Altro
tr: Takip Metrikleri: Tansiyon; Vücut yağı; Kalori; Seyahat edilen mesafe; Kalp atışı; Uyku; Adım sayısı; Diğer
pt-BR: Métricas de rastreamento: Pressão arterial; Gordura corporal; Calorias; Distância viajada; Frequência cardíaca; Sono; Passos; Outro
pl: Wskaźniki śledzenia: Ciśnienie krwi; Tkanka tłuszczowa; Kalorie; Przebyta odległość; Tętno; Sen; Kroki; Inne
lt-LT: Metrikos sekimas: Kraujospūdis; Kūno riebalai; Kalorijos; Nukeliautas atstumas; Širdies ritmas; Miegas; Žingsniai; Kita
th: ตัวชี้วัดการติดตาม: ความดันเลือด; ไขมันในร่างกาย; แคลอรี; ระยะทางที่เดินทาง; อัตราการเต้นของหัวใจ; การนอน; จำนวนก้าว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Indicatori de monitorizare: Tensiune arterială; Grăsime corporală; Calorii; Distanța parcursă; Ritmul cardiac; Somn; Pași; Altele
cs: Metrika sledování: Krevní tlak; Tělesný tuk; Kalorie; Ujetá vzdálenost; Tepová frekvence; Spánek; Kroky; Jiné
nb: Sporingsmål: Blodtrykk; Kroppsfett; Kalorier; Tilbakelagt avstand; Puls; Søvn; Trinn; Annet
fi: Seurantamittaristo: Verenpaine; Kehon rasva; Kalorit; Kuljettu matka; Syke; Uni; Askeleet; Muu
de: Tracking-Metriken: Blutdruck; Körperfett; Kalorien; Zurückgelegte Strecke; Pulsschlag; Schlaf; Stufen; Sonstiges
ko: 추적 항목: 혈압; 체지방; 칼로리; 이동 거리; 심박수; 잠; 계단; 기타
pt-PT: Métricas de rastreamento: Pressão arterial; Gordura corporal; Calorias; Distância percorrida; Batimento cardíaco; Sono; Passos; Outro
ru: Отслеживание показателей: Артериальное давление; Жировая масса; Калории; Пройденное расстояние; Частота сердечных сокращений; Сон; Шаги; Другое
vi: Số liệu theo dõi: Huyết áp; Mỡ cơ thể; Calo; Quãng đường đã đi; Nhịp tim; Giấc ngủ; Số bước; Khác
zh-CN: 跟踪指标: 血压; 体内脂肪; 卡路里; 行驶距离; 心率; 睡眠; 步数; 其他
hr-HR: Mjerni podaci za praćenje: Krvni tlak; Tjelesna mast; Kalorije; Prijeđena udaljenost; Otkucaji srca; Spavanje; Koraci; Ostalo
ja: 追跡指標: 血圧; 体脂肪; カロリー; 移動距離; 心拍数; 睡眠; 歩数; その他
hu: Követési mérőszámok: Vérnyomás; Testzsír; Kalória; Megtett távolság; Pulzusszám; Alvás; Lépések; Egyéb
da: Sporingsmålinger: Blodtryk; Kropsfedt; Kalorier; Tilbagelagt afstand; Hjerterytme; Søvn; Skridt; Andet
bg-BG: Проследяване на показатели: Кръвно налягане; Телесни мазнини; Калории; Изминато разстояние; Пулс; Сън; Крачки; Други
nl: Statistieken volgen: Bloeddruk; Lichaamsvet; Calorieën; Afgelegde afstand; Hartslag; Slaap; Stappen; Andere
zh-TW: 追蹤指標: 血壓; 體脂; 卡路里; 行駛距離; 心率; 睡眠; 步數; 其他
sv: Spårningsmätvärden: Blodtryck; Kroppsfett; Kalorier; Distans rest; Hjärtfrekvens; Sömn; Steg; Övrigt
sk-SK: Metriky sledovania: Krvný tlak; Telesný tuk; Kalórie; Prejdená vzdialenosť; Srdcová frekvencia; Spánok; Kroky; Iné
sl-SI: Meritve spremljanja: Krvni tlak; Telesna maščoba; Kalorije; Prepotovana razdalja; Srčni utrip; Spanec; Koraki; Drugo
es: Métricas de seguimiento: Presión arterial; Grasa corporal; Calorías; Distancia recorrida; Ritmo cardiaco; Descanso; Pasos; Otros
fr: Mesures de suivi: Pression artérielle; Graisse corporelle; Calories; Suivi de distance; Rythme cardiaque; Sommeil; Pas; Autre